Utah statutes.
36-19-1.   Conflict of interest -- Prohibition of benefit.
(1)  A legislator, member of his household, or client shall not be a party to
or have an interest in the profits or benefits of a state contract when the
state contract is the direct result of a bill sponsored by the legislator
unless the contract is let in compliance with state procurement policies and
is open to the general public.
(2)  Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a class B
misdemeanor.
